Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1202
Mutual finance organization, defined.

For purposes of the Mutual Finance Assistance Act, mutual finance organization means a group of rural or suburban fire protection districts, cities, or villages which enter into an agreement pursuant to section 35-1204 to cooperate for purposes of financing operational and equipment needs for fire protection, emergency response, or training within their joint areas of operation.

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 2.